New York, session 2025-2026, S10173.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 211, 212, and 2 401 of the retirement and social security law and any other law, regu- 3 lation, or rule to the contrary, a retired police officer who has 4 retired from the New York state and local police and fire retirement 5 system or the New York city police pension plan may be employed and earn 6 compensation in a part-time position as a police officer in the town of 7 Pound Ridge, county of Westchester, without any effect on such officer's 8 status as retired, without suspension or diminution of such officer's 9 retirement allowance, and without prior approval under section 211 of 10 the retirement and social security law. Such part-time police officer 11 shall be permitted to work up to one thousand forty hours in any calen- 12 dar year. Earnings received as a result of such part-time employment as 13 a police officer in the town of Pound Ridge, county of Westchester, 14 shall not be included in a retired police officer's earnings when apply- 15 ing the earnings limitations imposed by subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 16 212 of the retirement and social security law. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027 and shall expire and 18 be deemed repealed January 1, 2030. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15690-03-6